Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.135

Address verification.

(1) When an offender registers with the county sheriff pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, the county sheriff shall notify the police chief or town marshal of the jurisdiction in which the offender has registered to live. If the offender registers to live in an unincorporated area of the county, the sheriff shall make reasonable attempts to verify that the offender is residing at the registered address. If the offender registers to live in an incorporated city or town, the police chief or town marshal shall make reasonable attempts to verify that the offender is residing at the registered address. Reasonable attempts include verifying an offender's address pursuant to the grant program established under RCW 36.28A.230. If the sheriff or police chief or town marshal does not participate in the grant program established under RCW 36.28A.230, reasonable attempts require a yearly mailing by certified mail, with return receipt requested, a nonforwardable verification form to the offender at the offender's last registered address sent by the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live. For offenders who have been previously designated sexually violent predators under chapter 71.09 RCW or the equivalent procedure in another jurisdiction, even if the designation has subsequently been removed, this mailing must be sent every ninety days.

The offender must sign the verification form, state on the form whether he or she still resides at the last registered address, and return the form to the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the offender is registered to live within ten days after receipt of the form.

(2) The chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the offender has registered to live shall make reasonable attempts to locate any sex offender who fails to return the verification form or who cannot be located at the registered address.

If the offender fails to return the verification form or the offender is not at the last registered address, the chief law enforcement officer of the jurisdiction where the offender has registered to live shall promptly forward this information to the county sheriff and to the Washington state patrol for inclusion in the central registry of sex offenders.

(3) When an offender notifies the county sheriff of a change to his or her residence address pursuant to RCW 9A.44.130, and the new address is in a different law enforcement jurisdiction, the county sheriff shall notify the police chief or town marshal of the jurisdiction from which the offender has moved.

(4) County sheriffs and police chiefs or town marshals may enter into agreements for the purposes of delegating the authority and obligation to fulfill the requirements of this section.

[ 2010 c 265 s 2; 2000 c 91 s 1; 1999 c 196 s 15; 1998 c 220 s 2; 1995 c 248 s 3.]

NOTES:

Construction—Short title—1999 c 196: See RCW 72.09.904 and 72.09.905.

Severability—1999 c 196: See note following RCW 9.94A.010.

Severability—1998 c 220: See note following RCW 9A.44.130.